Nevada, session 83, AB450.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 641A.242 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641A.242 1. The Board [may] shall issue a license by
endorsement to practice as a marriage and family therapist or
clinical professional counselor to an applicant who meets the
requirements set forth in this section. An applicant may submit to
the Board an application for such a license if the applicant holds a
corresponding valid and unrestricted license as a marriage and
family therapist or clinical professional counselor, as applicable, in
the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United
States.
2. An applicant for a license by endorsement pursuant to this
section must submit to the Board with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 1;
(2) Has not been disciplined [or investigated] by the
corresponding regulatory authority of the District of Columbia or
the state or territory in which the applicant holds a license as a
marriage and family therapist or clinical professional counselor, as
applicable; and
(3) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable for
malpractice in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of
the United States;
(b) A complete set of fingerprints and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a report on the applicant’s
background, and to such other law enforcement agencies as the
Board deems necessary for a report on the applicant’s background;
(c) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and correct;
(d) The fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to NRS 641A.290
for the application for an initial license and for the initial issuance of
a license; and
(e) Any other information required by the Board.
3. Not later than 15 business days after receiving an application
for a license by endorsement to practice as a marriage and family
therapist or clinical professional counselor pursuant to this section,
the Board shall provide written notice to the applicant of any
additional information required by the Board to consider the
application. Unless the Board denies the application for good cause,
the Board shall approve the application and issue a license by
endorsement to practice as a marriage and family therapist or
clinical professional counselor, as applicable, to the applicant not
later than 45 days after receiving all the additional information
required by the Board to complete the application.
4. A license by endorsement to practice as a marriage and
family therapist or clinical professional counselor may be issued at a
meeting of the Board or between its meetings by the President of the
Board. Such an action shall be deemed to be an action of the Board.
5. At any time before making a final decision on an application
for a license by endorsement pursuant to this section, the Board
may, for any reason, grant a provisional license authorizing an
applicant to practice as a marriage and family therapist or clinical
professional counselor, as applicable, in accordance with regulations
adopted by the Board.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)